Washington statutes.
RCW 35.68.060

Method of payment of assessments.

The city council shall by resolution provide whether the full amount of the assessment shall be paid in one payment or whether it may be paid in installments and shall prescribe the time and amount of such payments; and if more than one payment is provided for, the city council may by resolution provide for interest on unpaid installments and fix the rate thereof.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.68.060. Prior: 1949 c 177 s 6; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 9332f.]